Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-3415
Conflicts of interest; board; duties.

(1) No member of the board or employee of a land bank shall acquire any interest, direct or indirect, in real property of the land bank, in any real property to be acquired by the land bank, or in any real property to be acquired from the land bank. No member of the board or employee of a land bank shall have any interest, direct or indirect, in any contract or proposed contract for materials or services to be furnished or used by a land bank. No member of the board or employee of a land bank shall have any interest, direct or indirect, in any investment of the land bank. The restrictions in this subsection shall also apply to a board member's or employee's immediate family and to any business or entity in which the board member or employee has a financial interest.

(2) The board shall adopt:

(a) Rules addressing potential conflicts of interest; and

(b) Ethical guidelines for members of the board and employees of the land bank.

Laws 2013, LB97, § 15;

R.S.Supp.,2018, § 19-5215;

Laws 2020, LB424, § 15.